Illinois, session 104th, HB2472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 155.29 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/155.29)  (from Ch. 73, par. 767.29)7    Sec. 155.29. (a) Purpose. The purpose of this Section is 8to regulate the use of aftermarket crash parts by requiring 9disclosure when any use of an aftermarket non-original 10equipment manufacturer's crash part is proposed and by 11requiring that the manufacturers of such aftermarket crash 12parts be identified.13    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section the following 14terms have the following meanings:15    "Aftermarket crash part" means a replacement for any of 16the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts that generally 17constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner 18and outer panels.19    "Non-original equipment manufacturer (Non-OEM) 20aftermarket crash part" means an aftermarket crash part not 21made for or by the manufacturer of the motor vehicle.22    "Repair facility" means any motor vehicle dealer, garage, 23body shop, or other commercial entity that undertakes the   HB2472- 2 -LRB104 11492 BAB 21581 b1repair or replacement of those parts that generally constitute 2the exterior of a motor vehicle.3    "Installer" means an individual who actually does the work 4of replacing or repairing parts of a motor vehicle.5    (c) Identification. Any aftermarket crash part supplied by 6a non-original equipment manufacturer for use in this State 7after the effective date of this Act shall have affixed 8thereto or inscribed thereon the logo or name of its 9manufacturer. The manufacturer's logo or name shall be visible 10after installation whenever practicable.11    (d) Disclosure. No insurer shall specify the use of 12non-OEM aftermarket crash parts in the repair of an insured's 13motor vehicle, nor shall any repair facility or installer use 14non-OEM aftermarket crash parts to repair a vehicle unless the 15customer is advised of that fact in writing. In all instances 16where an insurer intends that non-OEM aftermarket crash parts 17be used in the repair of a motor vehicle, the insurer shall 18provide the customer with the following information:19        (1) a written estimate that clearly identifies each 20    non-OEM aftermarket crash part; and21        (2) a disclosure settlement incorporated into or 22    attached to the estimate that reads as follows: "This 23    estimate has been prepared based on the use of crash parts 24    supplied by a source other than the manufacturer of your 25    motor vehicle. Warranties applicable to these replacement 26    parts are provided by the manufacturer or distributor of   HB2472- 3 -LRB104 11492 BAB 21581 b1    these parts rather than the manufacturer of your vehicle."2    (e) Procedures. No insurer shall specify the use of repair 3procedures that are not in compliance with original equipment 4manufacturer directives for those parts in the repair of an 5insured's motor vehicle, nor shall any repair facility or 6installer use repair procedures that are not in compliance 7with original equipment manufacturer directives for those 8parts to repair a vehicle. However, this subsection does not 9require the use of original equipment manufacturer repair 10parts or original equipment manufacturer advanced driver 11assistance system calibration tools that may be recommended in 12an original equipment manufacturer directive if the repair 13parts or calibration tools used are at least equal in like kind 14and quality and otherwise conform to original equipment 15manufacturer directives. 16(Source: P.A. 86-1234; 86-1475.) 17    Section 10. The Automotive Collision Repair Act is amended 18by changing Section 15 as follows: 19    (815 ILCS 308/15)20    Sec. 15. Disclosure to consumers; estimates. 21    (a) No work for compensation that exceeds $100 shall be 22commenced without specific authorization from the consumer 23after the disclosure set forth in this Section.24    (b) Every motor vehicle collision repair facility shall   HB2472- 4 -LRB104 11492 BAB 21581 b1either (i) give to each consumer a written estimated price for 2labor and parts for a specific repair and shall not charge for 3work done or parts supplied in an amount that exceeds the 4estimate by more than 10% without oral or written consent from 5the consumer; or (ii) give to each consumer a written price 6limit for each specific repair and shall not exceed that limit 7without oral or written consent of the consumer. The estimate 8shall include the total costs to repair the motor vehicle.9    Estimates shall include all charges to be paid by the 10consumer to complete the repair, including any charges for 11estimates, diagnostics, storage, and administrative fees.12    (c) Motor vehicle collision repair facilities shall 13describe in the estimate the major parts needed to effectuate 14the repair and shall designate the parts as either new parts, 15used parts, rebuilt or reconditioned parts, or aftermarket 16parts as set forth in Section 10 of this Act.17    (d) Estimates shall indicate that the collision repair 18facility may use a combination of industry standard flat rate 19(time) manuals, actual time, or condition of the motor vehicle 20to determine labor costs. This disclosure mandate may also be 21fulfilled by means of a sign that provides the same 22information to the consumer. The sign shall be posted at a 23location that can be easily viewed by the consumer.24    (e) If it is necessary to disassemble or partially 25disassemble a motor vehicle or motor vehicle component in 26order to provide the consumer a written estimate for required   HB2472- 5 -LRB104 11492 BAB 21581 b1repairs, the estimate shall show the cost of any disassembly 2if the consumer elects not to proceed with the repair of the 3motor vehicle.4    (f) The estimate shall include the date the estimate was 5prepared or the date the motor vehicle was presented to the 6collision repair facility for repair and the odometer reading 7on the motor vehicle at the time the motor vehicle was left 8with the collision repair facility.9    (g) The estimate shall include the use of repair 10procedures and replacement parts that are in compliance with 11original equipment manufacturer directives for those parts. 12However, this subsection does not require the use of original 13equipment manufacturer repair parts or original equipment 14manufacturer advanced driver assistance system calibration 15tools that may be recommended in an original equipment 16manufacturer directive if the repair parts or calibration 17tools used are at least equal in like kind and quality and 18otherwise conform to original equipment manufacturer 19directives. 20(Source: P.A. 93-565, eff. 1-1-04.)